Missouri, session 2026, HB2781.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 595.045, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 595.045 and 595.250, to read as follows:
595.045. 1. There is established in the state treasury the "Crime Victims'
Compensation Fund". A surcharge of [seven] seventeen dollars and fifty cents shall be
assessed as costs in each court proceeding filed in any court in the state in all criminal cases
including violations of any county ordinance or any violation of criminal or traffic laws of the
state, including an infraction and violation of a municipal ordinance; except that no such fee
shall be collected in any proceeding in any court when the proceeding or the defendant has
been dismissed by the court or when costs are to be paid by the state, county, or municipality.
A surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed as costs in a juvenile court
proceeding in which a child is found by the court to come within the applicable provisions of
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the moneys collected
by clerks of the courts pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall be
collected and disbursed in accordance with sections 488.010 to 488.020 and shall be payable
to the director of the department of revenue.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit annually the amount of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars to the state forensic laboratory account administered by the department of
public safety to provide financial assistance to defray expenses of crime laboratories if such
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2781 2
analytical laboratories are registered with the federal Drug Enforcement Agency or the
Missouri department of health and senior services. Subject to appropriations made therefor,
such funds shall be distributed by the department of public safety to the crime laboratories
serving the courts of this state making analysis of a controlled substance or analysis of blood,
breath or urine in relation to a court proceeding.
4. The remaining funds collected under subsection 1 of this section shall be denoted
to the payment of an annual appropriation for the administrative and operational costs of the
office for victims of crime and, if a statewide automated crime victim notification system is
established pursuant to section 650.310, to the monthly payment of expenditures actually
incurred in the operation of such system. Additional remaining funds shall be subject to the
following provisions:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of revenue or the director's designee shall
determine the balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund available to
satisfy the amount of compensation payable pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075,
excluding sections 595.050 and 595.055, and the amount required to be deposited under
section 595.250;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first of each month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds available
to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund and fifty percent to the services to
victims' fund established in section 595.100.
5. The director of revenue or such director's designee shall at least monthly report the
moneys paid pursuant to this section into the crime victims' compensation fund and the
services to victims fund to the department of public safety.
6. The moneys collected by clerks of municipal courts pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section shall be collected and disbursed as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. Five
percent of such moneys shall be payable to the city treasury of the city from which such funds
were collected. The remaining ninety-five percent of such moneys shall be payable to the
director of revenue. The funds received by the director of revenue pursuant to this subsection
shall be distributed as follows:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of revenue or the director's designee shall
determine the balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund available to
satisfy the amount of compensation payable pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075,
excluding sections 595.050 and 595.055, and the amount required to be deposited under
section 595.250;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first of each month the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds available

HB 2781 3
to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund and fifty percent to the services to
victims' fund established in section 595.100.
7. These funds shall be subject to a biennial audit by the Missouri state auditor. Such
audit shall include all records associated with crime victims' compensation funds collected,
held or disbursed by any state agency.
8. In addition to the moneys collected pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, the
court shall enter a judgment in favor of the state of Missouri, payable to the crime victims'
compensation fund, of sixty-eight dollars upon a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for a class
A or B felony; forty-six dollars upon a plea of guilty or finding of guilt for a class C, D, or E
felony; and ten dollars upon a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for any misdemeanor under
Missouri law except for those in chapter 252 relating to fish and game, chapter 302 relating to
drivers' and commercial drivers' license, chapter 303 relating to motor vehicle financial
responsibility, chapter 304 relating to traffic regulations, chapter 306 relating to watercraft
regulation and licensing, and chapter 307 relating to vehicle equipment regulations. Any
clerk of the court receiving moneys pursuant to such judgments shall collect and disburse
such crime victims' compensation judgments in the manner provided by sections 488.010 to
488.020. Such funds shall be payable to the state treasury and deposited to the credit of the
crime victims' compensation fund.
9. The clerk of the court processing such funds shall maintain records of all
dispositions described in subsection 1 of this section and all dispositions where a judgment
has been entered against a defendant in favor of the state of Missouri in accordance with this
section; all payments made on judgments for alcohol-related traffic offenses; and any
judgment or portion of a judgment entered but not collected. These records shall be subject to
audit by the state auditor. The clerk of each court transmitting such funds shall report
separately the amount of dollars collected on judgments entered for alcohol-related traffic
offenses from other crime victims' compensation collections or services to victims
collections.
10. The department of revenue shall maintain records of funds transmitted to the
crime victims' compensation fund by each reporting court and collections pursuant to
subsection 16 of this section and shall maintain separate records of collection for alcohol-
related offenses.
11. The state courts administrator shall include in the annual report required by
section 476.350 the circuit court caseloads and the number of crime victims' compensation
judgments entered.
12. All awards made to injured victims under sections 595.010 to 595.105 and all
appropriations for administration of sections 595.010 to 595.105, except sections 595.050 and
595.055, shall be made from the crime victims' compensation fund. Any unexpended balance

HB 2781 4
remaining in the crime victims' compensation fund at the end of each biennium shall not be
subject to the provision of section 33.080 requiring the transfer of such unexpended balance
to the ordinary revenue fund of the state, but shall remain in the crime victims' compensation
fund. In the event that there are insufficient funds in the crime victims' compensation fund to
pay all claims in full, all claims shall be paid on a pro rata basis. If there are no funds in the
crime victims' compensation fund, then no claim shall be paid until funds have again
accumulated in the crime victims' compensation fund. When sufficient funds become
available from the fund, awards which have not been paid shall be paid in chronological order
with the oldest paid first. In the event an award was to be paid in installments and some
100 remaining installments have not been paid due to a lack of funds, then when funds do become
101 available that award shall be paid in full. All such awards on which installments remain due
102 shall be paid in full in chronological order before any other postdated award shall be paid.
103 Any award pursuant to this subsection is specifically not a claim against the state, if it cannot
104 be paid due to a lack of funds in the crime victims' compensation fund.
105 13. When judgment is entered against a defendant as provided in this section and such
106 sum, or any part thereof, remains unpaid, there shall be withheld from any disbursement,
107 payment, benefit, compensation, salary, or other transfer of money from the state of Missouri
108 to such defendant an amount equal to the unpaid amount of such judgment. Such amount
109 shall be paid forthwith to the crime victims' compensation fund and satisfaction of such
110 judgment shall be entered on the court record. Under no circumstances shall the general
111 revenue fund be used to reimburse court costs or pay for such judgment. The director of the
112 department of corrections shall have the authority to pay into the crime victims' compensation
113 fund from an offender's compensation or account the amount owed by the offender to the
114 crime victims' compensation fund, provided that the offender has failed to pay the amount
115 owed to the fund prior to entering a correctional facility of the department of corrections.
116 14. All interest earned as a result of investing funds in the crime victims'
117 compensation fund shall be paid into the crime victims' compensation fund and not into the
118 general revenue of this state.
119 15. Any person who knowingly makes a fraudulent claim or false statement in
120 connection with any claim hereunder is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
121 16. The department may receive gifts and contributions for the benefit of crime
122 victims. Such gifts and contributions shall be credited to the crime victims' compensation
123 fund as used solely for compensating victims under the provisions of sections 595.010 to
124 595.075.
595.250. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Victims of
Domestic Violence Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected under subsection 1 of
section 595.045. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with

HB 2781 5
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used
solely for the administration of this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium
shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest
moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and
moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
2. Ten dollars from the surcharge collected under subsection 1 of section 595.045
shall be deposited into the victims of domestic violence fund established under
subsection 1 of this section for victims of domestic violence.
3. A victim of domestic violence may be compensated under the fund established
under subsection 1 of this section or the fund established under section 595.045, but the
victim shall not receive compensation from both funds if the compensation the victim is
seeking is based on the same incident.
✔